Wisconsin, session 2025, AB970.
do enact as follows:AB970,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB970,29Section 2. 20.435 (1) (ck) of the statutes is created to read:AB970,2,131020.435 (1) (ck) Community emergency medical services grants. As a 11continuing appropriation, the amounts in the schedule for the community 12emergency medical services grants under 2025 Wisconsin Act .... (this act), section 134 (1) (b) and (c).AB970,314Section 3. 20.435 (1) (ck) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 15.... (this act), is repealed.AB970,416Section 4. Nonstatutory provisions.AB970,3,11(1) Community emergency medical services grants pilot program. AB970,3,22(a) In this subsection:AB970,3,431. “Community emergency medical services practitioner” has the meaning 4given in s. 256.21 (1).AB970,3,552. “Community paramedic” has the meaning given in s. 256.205 (1).AB970,3,863. “Municipal emergency medical services program” means an emergency 7medical services program under s. 256.12 (2) (a) that is conducted by a county, city, 8village, or town, or any combination thereof.AB970,3,159(b) From the appropriation under s. 20.435 (1) (ck), the department of health 10services shall award grants to 6 municipal emergency medical services programs to 11provide community emergency medical services under s. 256.215 (2) and hire a full-12time community paramedic or community emergency medical services practitioner. 13The department of health services shall give preference in awarding the grants 14under this paragraph to 2 rural, 2 suburban, and 2 urban municipal emergency 15medical services programs.AB970,3,2116(c) From the appropriation under s. 20.435 (1) (ck), if funding is available in 17that appropriation after the department of health services awards the grants under 18par. (b), the department of health services may award a grant to a 7th municipal 19emergency medical services program to provide community emergency medical 20services under s. 256.215 (2) and hire a full-time community paramedic or 21community emergency medical services practitioner.AB970,4,222(d) The department of health services may not award a grant under par. (b) or 23(c) to a municipal emergency medical services program that, at the time of applying 1for the grant, employs a community paramedic or community emergency medical 2services practitioner.AB970,4,53(e) The department of health services may not award a grant under par. (b) or 4(c) after the last day of the 12th month beginning after the effective date of this 5paragraph.AB970,4,126(f) Within one year after receiving a grant under par. (b) or (c), a grant 7recipient shall submit to the department of health services and the appropriate 8standing committees of the legislature under s. 13.172 (3) a report that details the 9effectiveness of the grant, including, since the receipt of the grant, the estimated 10cost savings and the estimated number of individuals served by the community 11paramedic or community emergency medical services practitioner who was hired as 12a result of the grant.AB970,4,1713(2) Grants for statewide falls prevention awareness and initiatives. 14From the appropriation under s. 20.435 (1) (a), the department of health services 15shall award a grant of $200,000 in each of fiscal years 2025-26 and 2026-27 to the 16Wisconsin Institute for Healthy Aging for the purpose of statewide falls prevention 17awareness and initiatives.AB970,518Section 5. Fiscal changes.AB970,5,219(1) Grants for statewide falls prevention awareness and initiatives. 20In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of 21health services under s. 20.435 (1) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is 22increased by $200,000 to award a grant under Section 4 (2) of this act. In the 23schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of health 1services under s. 20.435 (1) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is 2increased by $200,000 to award a grant under Section 4 (2) of this act.AB970,63Section 6. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 4publication, except as follows:AB970,5,65(1) Community emergency medical services grants; repeal. The repeal 6of s. 20.435 (1) (ck) takes effect on July 1, 2027.AB970,5,77